Utah statutes.
78B-17-103.   Scope -- Unauthorized practice of law prohibited -- Reciprocity required.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), this chapter applies only to issuance, service, and enforcement of subpoenas as provided in this chapter.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection 78B-17-201(1)(b), nothing in this chapter may be construed to exempt an attorney from another state from complying with statutes and rules governing unauthorized practice of law or from the requirements contained in the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure governing limited appearance.

(3)  Parties resident in another state may use the provisions of this chapter for issuance, service, or enforcement of subpoenas only if the other state has enacted this uniform act or enacted provisions substantially similar to this uniform act.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2008 General Session

